Wyoming statutes. Title 31 Motor Vehicles
Article 3. Dealers and Manufacturers

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Validity and construction of statute regulating dealings between automobile manufacturers, distributors and dealers, 7 ALR3d 1173; 82 ALR4th 624; 51 ALR Fed 812.

§§ 31-2-301 through 31-2-304.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1997, ch. 154, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

These sections, which derived from Laws 1984, ch. 47, § 3, and Laws 1989, ch. 7, § 1, related to dealer and manufacturer licensing.